New Jersey, session 221, S2630.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A board of education shall provide a hiring preference to veterans, as defined in N.J.S.11A:5-1, for teaching positions, provided that in all measurable criteria, the veteran and nonveteran are equally qualified. b.  In the case of any school district that has adopted Title 11A, Civil Service, of the New Jersey Statutes, the provisions of chapter 5 of Title 11A shall supersede the provisions of this section for those persons in the classified service of the civil service. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.